Tennessee, session 114, SB1685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-7-208(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "necessary to the conduct of such industry or business".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-7-208(i), is amended by deleting
the subsection.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1685
010554
- 1 -